Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.175

Service credit for paid leave of absence—Application to elected officials of labor organizations.

(1) A member who is on a paid leave of absence authorized by a member's employer shall continue to receive service credit as provided under the provisions of RCW 41.40.145 through 41.40.363.

(2) A member who receives compensation from an employer while on an authorized leave of absence to serve as an elected official of a labor organization, and whose employer is reimbursed by the labor organization for the compensation paid to the member during the period of absence, may also be considered to be on a paid leave of absence. This subsection shall only apply if the member's leave of absence is authorized by a collective bargaining agreement that provides that the member retains seniority rights with the employer during the period of leave. The compensation earnable reported for a member who establishes service credit under this subsection may not be greater than the salary paid to the highest paid job class covered by the collective bargaining agreement.

[ 1993 c 95 s 1.]

NOTES:

Retroactive application—1993 c 95: "This act applies on a retroactive basis to members for whom compensation and hours were reported under the circumstances described in sections 1 through 6 of this act. This act may also be applied on a retroactive basis to January 1, 1992, to members for whom compensation and hours would have been reported except for chapter 3, Laws of 1992, or explicit instructions from the department of retirement systems." [ 1993 c 95 s 9.]

Effective date—1993 c 95: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [April 21, 1993]." [ 1993 c 95 s 11.]